Alaska statutes. Title 15. Elections.
Article 4. Voting by Mail.

Sec. 15.20.800.
Voting by mail.

The director may conduct an election by mail if it is held at a time other than when the general, party primary, or municipal election is held.

If the director conducts an election under (a) of this section by mail, the director shall send a ballot for each election described in (a) of this section to each person whose name appears on the official registration list prepared under AS

15.07.125

for that election. The director shall send ballots by first class, nonforwardable mail. The ballot shall be sent to the address stated on the official registration list unless

the voter has notified the director or an election supervisor of a different address to which the ballot should be sent; or

the address on the official registration list has been identified as being an undeliverable address.

If the director conducts an election under (a) of this section by mail, the director shall mail ballots under this section on or before the 22nd day before the election.

The voter may cast the ballot under AS

15.20.081(d)

— (f).

The director shall review ballots voted under this section under procedures established for the review of absentee ballots under AS

15.20.201

and

15.20.203

. The director shall establish the schedule for counting ballots in an election conducted by mail.

History.

(§ 23 ch 85 SLA 1986; am § 46 ch 86 SLA 1996; am § 56 ch 82 SLA 2000; am § 22 ch 2 FSSLA 2005)

Revisor’s notes. —

Enacted as AS 15.20.750.
Renumbered in 1986.

Cross references. —

For a temporary provision expanding the director's authority to conduct an election by mail during the COVID-19 public health disaster emergency declared March 11, 2020, see § 9, ch. 10, SLA 2020 in the 2020 Temporary and Special Acts.

Administrative Code. —

For absentee and questioned voting, see 6 AAC 25, art. 3.